Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.130

License suspension—Noncompliance with support order—Reissuance.

The department shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified under *RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license is automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

[ 2009 c 412 s 14.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 74.20A.320 was amended by 2009 c 408 s 1, deleting language referring to certification. RCW 74.20A.324 appears to be the more appropriate reference.